Chapter 1: El Mañana 

They say Deja vu is proof that you are where you're supposed to be. Jack couldn’t say if that was true or not; but then again how could he? He wasn't born in this world. Jack was Anonymous, a human born in a different world but brought to this one by some unknown force. Why it didn't work the other way around, he would never know, as well he would never question it, after all what would that gain him? Knowledge of some arcane insight? No, he didn’t bother with the intricacies of para-dimensional travel.

Jack was Anonymous, but different than most of the other members. While for the most part, they were fully grown when brought here, he was brought to this world when he was...well, no one knew for sure the exact date or what age he was. Instead, he got a guess for an age and a "birthdate" from when he was found; cold, ragged and starving as a toddler. Being raised in this world by a human and an Anthro might have given him a bias, but he tried not to let that bother him.

Even as he grew up his Capybara mother told him, "Love people for who they are, not what they are!” and his father, a third generation anonymous echoed that sentiment.
"Love who you love, be what you want, you do you" his father always told him.

Jack graduated college, and was instantly recruited by the BHA. Why wouldn't he be? He WAS Anonymous. He was the bridge between this world and that one... The one he “Belonged" to and this one he grew up in. 

The BHA recruited him and sent him abroad, to countries and world's vastly different places. Brazil, the murder capital of the world was one of those places. He needed to find some Anons, three exactly. The searching process turned up nothing, and when he dug deeper, groups became interested and hunted for him. In the end a man called "The Raider" saved him, after his helicopter was shot down by groups of rebels. What they were even rebelling against was a mystery at this point, after all they had everything needed provided.

The Raider seemed like a nice enough guy, scarred and with a distant look in his eyes, but still a good guy. Jack noticed the way he looked after a rare golden Ocelot, with fevered love and compassion. Jack almost envied that feeling. The feeling of love so deep you would do anything for them.

presently though, Jack sat behind his desk at the BHA headquarters, organizing the various Anons who came through the system. An Anon from California who was a firefighter? Get him a re-certification. An Anon from New York that was lawyer, help him get scheduled to take the bar. That was his job and he did it well. These weren't the days of old where someone had to just claim they were something, they needed to prove it. And Jack was the approving official. 

Being a part of the BHA was almost natural in that sense. Jack's position, while realistic, was also political. Who would question an Anonymous member on assigning another Anonymous member a job? No one. The general populace thought no one else was qualified for the job. Sure, Jack didn't even remember his old world, but he was Anonymous. His word was law in regard to it all.

But he wasn't heartless. Why should he be? He gained nothing from disregarding the men and women from the other world. His mother always said "do unto others" when she was alive. He tried to be as fair and impartial as she would have been, But at the same time he was practical. How could a 20 something year old be a Vietnam vet? There were no proven cases of time distortion, so why should he believe when a person claimed to be a Korean War vet born in 1987, but somehow here in this world during the current year? It simply wasn't possible.

"Look sir, I understand you claim to be the CEO of a company, but we can't do anything about that, the only thing we can do is help you try to start up this company again" he said on the phone to a very angry Anonymous member. Sure, the guy claimed to be the Former CEO of some company he had never heard of, but what was Jack to do? Kick the CEO of an already existing company out for this guy? No. This new Anonymous member would have to restart, albeit with a loan from the BHA to restart his company.

A few minutes of getting yelled at through the phone and a sudden hang up on the other end was a bit of a comfort, no need to have awkward goodbyes and details of how to contacts his higher ups. Just the cold silence of a dead phone call.

"Fuck" Jack sighed to himself as he hung up his own phone and looked at his computer. Lists of names; anonymous members, and their status in the system sat in front of him.  Anon X from Canada worked at a warehouse. Anon Y from Utah was a preacher? What is even the pay of a preacher? Jack sighed at his misfortune for dealing with such an individual and rubbed his face calmly.

Looking at the time, he saw it was nearly noon, and therefore time for a quick break. Sure he didn’t smoke, but why would that limit his ability to take breaks? Standing and stretching, he felt the relaxation already begin to set in as his joints creaked and cracked. 

That Relaxation was quickly broken though when he heard a quiet sob as he passed by his neighbors cubicle. A sob? Why? He might not be a nosey individual but he couldn't just leave a crying woman alone. Sure, he hadn't really talked to the person in the cubicle  neighboring his much, but he liked her well enough.

Meghan Stone was her name, and she was a Hybrid of some sort. Peeking into her office space showed she was in fact crying softly, trying not to draw attention to herself. Jack's heart fell when he saw her quietly crying, her muzzle buried in her paws. 

Crying is weird in people, when they cry loudly, it’s for attention, but then the cry silently, it’s because they can't help themselves. Here was Meghan, tears rolling down her muzzle, staring at a computer screen through the paws.

"Meghan? You ok?" Jack called out to her, already knowing she wasn't. Sure she was sad, but how could he just leave her to cry to herself? She was a good person, at least from what he knew of her she was.  Meghan sat upright quickly upon hearing his voice, then wiped her eyes before turning her swivel chair to look at him. 

"Jack! Hey! Yea I’m fine! What’s up" she said, lying through her teeth. She wore a white button up shirt and a black skirt along with some black open toes shoes. Her long hair was a mixture of black and purple, which Jack assumed was either dye or some sort of odd mixture from hybridization. Behind her swished a long brown tail, ringed like a raccoon, yet set with odd rings like a snow leopard.

While Jack might not have been the most attentive person, he pulled up a spare chair in her cube, looking at her with concern.

"Meghan, I saw you crying...what’s wrong?" he said, unsure as to what to do with his hands. Should he put a hand on her shoulder? Fold them quietly in his lap? No. he opted to put on softly on one of her paws.

Meghan looked quietly up at him, as though she feared his response before answering.

"The...some on the other Anthros around here...the BHA I mean... aren't really nice to me because I'm..." she said, quietly trailing off while looking into the distance.

"Because you're...?" Jack said, squeezing her paw gently. Sure, this was none of his business, but what kind of person would he be to leave a crying person without console?

"Because I'm a hybrid" She said finally, looking at Jack with her deep violet eyes.

This puzzled Jack a bit. He knew she was a hybrid from her various attributes, Feline like claws, rounded ears like a raccoon and thick fluffy tail that she would occasionally bite when working on a difficult task.

"Because you're a hybrid?" jack copied her, with a bit of questioning. Why should it matter she was a hybrid? She was smart, funny and a good person; at least that’s what he gleaned from their limited interactions. 

She nodded, then looked up at him, letting her violet eyes meet his before squeezing his hand gently.

"Promise not to talk about it to the others?" She said quietly, with a faint sad smile.

Jack nodded quickly. "Of course" he said with confidence. Sure, he had worked for the BHA for a long time, but there were few people whom he worked with he was actually friendly with. Not to say he didn't get along with people here, more to say he just didn't count them as friends. Even more to the point he wouldn't gossip like a clucking hen to anyone around here.

"I’m a Hybrid...and a very obvious one. Most of the time Anthros stick to their own species" she said to him quietly, like it was more admitting it than confessing it. Jack nodded quietly, unsure of what that had to do with anything.

"And us Hybrids aren't quite...smiled upon" she said after a pause. A small tear formed as she said that she was a hybrid, and she looked away from Jack, almost like she expected him to reel back and spite her for something she couldn't control. Jack calmly looked at her and smiled.

"The other Anthros here tend to be a bit mean to me, stealing my lunch, leaving mean sticky notes" She said pointing to one in her trash can. Jack reach over and pulled out the crumpled note and looked at it. The words "Go Home Half breed" were scrawled on it.

"Ever since I started working here this kinda stuff happens, today was just...rougher than normal" Meghan said with some lament in her voice.

"Why? What happened today?" Jack asked. 

"Uh....Rachel, the German Shepard in accounting  was showing off the ring her boyfriend proposed with and one of the other girls looked at me and said "No one’s gonna propose to Meghan, she’s a mutt" and that just was..." Meghan’s voice trailed off, another tear rolling down her muzzle. 

Were Hybrids really that disliked? Jack had always thought Hybrids were something to be celebrated. After all they got the exoticness of 2 species of Anthro. Kinda like the, "Smarts of a cat and loyalty of a dog" thing. Even Now as Jack looked at Meghan, he could see she was a gorgeous Anthro. 

"Ok...So let’s go talk to someone who can help" Jack said almost out of instinct. Her problems were her own but....How could he leave her to deal with this on her own? This was a problem that reduced the poor girl to tears and one she obviously couldn’t handle on her own.

Meghan's eyes met Jack's in confusion. "Who could help me with this?" she said as a tear rolled down her muzzle.

That tear broke Jacks heart. Why did Anthros dislike her for something she had no control over? From what he knew of Meghan, she was friendly polite and a generally good person. In fact, the only thing he could think of was that maybe she indulged a bit too much when someone brought doughnuts, but that was hardly a reason to hate her.

He grasped her paw firmly, determined to get to the bottom of this and end this sadness. Sure, she was a co-worker, but she didn't deserve to be treated badly. As he pulled her gently to her feet, she looked at him with confusion.

"We need to talk to Jasmine" he said calmly, pulling the fluffy hybrid along. Even as he felt her grip slightly diminish from his, he held tight. 

Jasmine the tigress was in charge of meeting Anonymous members, and she took her job very seriously. From what Jack had seen she was kind, generous, and helpful to a fault. The man she was dating was also Anonymous, and while Jack had never met him, he sounded like he belonged in a Wild West film.

Those thoughts are pushed aside as Jack led Meghan to Jasmine's office, despite her weak protests. The quiet knocks on the tigress's office door were almost drown out by quiet pleading sobs from Meghan for him to stop and just let her get through it on her own. The fact she was sobbing about it meant Jack never could. Who could let a pleasant and beautiful woman suffer? Not him, and hopefully no one else.

"Come in!" came the happy tone from the tigress through the closed door. That was more than enough for Jack as he pulled Meghan in. Jasmine sat behind her desk, a worried grin upon her face as Jack led Meghan to a chair in front of Jasmine's desk. Meghan desperately was trying to hide her tears, and was also attempting to hide behind her big fluffy tail.

"Tell her" Jack said to Meghan offhandedly as he found a chair to the side of Jasmine's desk for himself. This wasn't about him after all, so he didn't need to really be part of this conversation.

As Jack looked up from getting his chair all set, he saw Jasmine looking at Meghan with nothing but concern. That was what Jack had expected from her, Jasmine was always so kind to everyone, and he admired that about her. In fact, that was one of the reasons he had brought Meghan to her. If anyone could help Meghan, Jasmine could.

"Uh..." Meghan started, looking from Jack to Jasmine uneasily.

"Tell her" he restated to Meghan, crossing his legs and leaning back in his seat.

"Uh...Some of our coworkers have been...unpleasant to me because of who I am" Meghan said, fidgeting with her paws and not looking at Jasmine; who, to her credit was giving Meghan all of her attention.

Jasmine looked hard at Meghan, then to Jack then back at Meghan. "Because you're a hybrid?" she said finally, with a slight frown on her face. Jack was a bit concerned when she said that. Sure Meghan was obviously a hybrid, but it seemed a bit harsh to point it out right away.

"Yes" Meghan said without missing a heartbeat. For someone who was so reluctant to admit being a hybrid to you, she was suddenly exceptionally sure of herself now.

Jasmine gave a sad smile and half nod, looking from Meghan to Jack.

"Well, I’m glad you found someone you can trust about you being a hybrid, and I’ll try to talk to your coworkers" she said finally.

Meghan looked a bit relieved, but Jasmine wasn't finished.

"Hybrids in today society aren't really seen as equals I’m afraid, so even if I say something, I doubt it will have much impact"

This made Jack frown, why wouldn’t it? He was essentially being told "Fuck who you are, what you are is all that matters" and from what he had seen from Meghan was that she cared deeply about her work and those she helped. Sure, to the Anonymous members she spoke to she was just a voice; but to those who were truly lost, her voice was a saving grace. She cared about the random human from another world, even if she never met them.

Jasmine continued however, explaining further.

"I too, am a hybrid, although without the fur dye you can't tell" She said before giving Jack a quick wink.

"Keep it secret, that’s an order" she said before focusing back on Meghan. “I have someone you can talk to about it, and it looks like you have someone who isn’t a psychiatrist to talk to about it"

Wait did she mean Jack? Jack only helped because he didn't want to shoulder her workload. That’s all it was right? Recalling the tears rolling down Meghan's muzzle, he knew that would be a lie. Jack watched as Jasmine scribbled something on a piece of paper then handed it to Meghan.

"This is the number and address to Dr. Cord, the Official BHA psychiatrist, He can help you, and he helped me" she said to Meghan before looking at Jack. 

"Take good care of her, this is a lot for someone to shoulder" Jasmine said finally, with a slight frown.

Jack nodded as Meghan stood up. He wasn't sure how he was going to “take care of her", but he was certain that he would try to make work a bit more inviting for her. He stood up and extended a hand to Meghan, who took it delicately.

"Thank you Jasmine" Meghan said, looking at the Smiling tigress.

"It’s no problem! If you have any more problems let me know and I’ll handle it myself!" Jasmine said happily.

Jack then led the now smiling Anthro out of Jasmine's office and headed back to his cubicle and by extension Meghan’s. Sure, this isn’t quite what he expected his small break to be, but still he counted it as a good break from work. After all it’s not every day that he got to help someone.

"Thanks Jack, I don't know if I would have gone to see Jasmine without you" Meghan said, squeezing his hand gently in her paw.

"It’s no big deal Meghan, I just don't like seeing a pretty girl cry" Jack said off-handedly.

Meghan’s ears fluttered a bit at those words.

"It really means a lot to me though" she said, with a smile "Can I pay you back with lunch? Someone stole mine from the fridge" The fluffy Anthro said with a sad smile.

Jack considered for a moment then nodded. Who would turn down lunch with a pretty lady? Not him, that’s for sure. 

"I would love to have lunch with you Meghan, what did you have in mind?" he said as they walked past to their cubicles.

Meghan grabbed her purse and car keys, then lead the way out of the building, earning a few stares. Jack actually thought it was funny as they walked together. Jack noted one of the girls Meghan said was mean to her looking at him with disdain, like he had insulted her family or something.  

"I was thinking uh... there’s a place that sells awesome Asian noodles down the street called big bowl! Have you been there? We can take my car!" Meghan asked with a smile.

Certainly a big change from earlier, and a very welcome one at that. Jack noticed how her smile was mesmerizing and how the sunlight shimmered on her long hair. He also noticed a few other things about her, like how her button up shirt strained to hold back her healthy bust and how curvaceous she was.

"I can't say I’ve been to big bowl before, but noodles sounds good, it’s been forever since I had good Asian food." Jack said as they walked together to her car, which was a basic red sedan. 

"Great! I go there from time to time and they have the best spicy pad Thai!" she said as she pushed the button on her car keys to unlock the doors "Sorry about the mess in the car, I need to clean it out".

A few stray food wrappers were on the floor of her passenger seat, and an empty soda can sat in the cup holders.

"It’s no big deal, my car is also a bit messy" Jack said with a smile as he climbed into the car. That wasn't exactly true, his car wasn't dirty at all, but he wasn't going to make Meghan feel bad about a few stray pieces of trash.  Meghan started the Car and rolled down the windows for some fresh air. It was early summer, so it wasn't too hot just yet. The cool air billowed through as Meghan drove with a smile on her face.

"So Jack... Are you this helpful to every lady you meet?" Meghan said, as the city blurred past. "Or do I get special treatment?"

"I just couldn't let you sit in your cubicle and cry, besides we've worked together for a while" Jack said, watching her ears perk up slightly and her tail swish behind her "So I guess you get the special treatment."

"Aww you're gonna make me blush" she said with a smile "I mean if I could blush I would but you know what I mean!"

Jack laughed and they continued talking for a bit as she drove. The ride itself wasn't very long with the restaurant being right down the street. True to its name, the restaurant had a large neon sign in the shape of a big bowl. Meghan was positively giddy as she got out of the car.

"Ooo my tummy is already growling thinking about that spicy Pad Thai! Come on jack!" she said happily as she bounded for the doors. Jack walked behind her, keeping his distance to not get swatted by her fluffy tail. He did however, quicken his pace when they reached the doors as to hold them open for her.

"Such a gentleman" she said in response to that.

"Hi, welcome to big bowl, table for 2?" the hostess a small Anthro squirrel said as Meghan walked up to the podium.

"Yes please!" 

Jack and Meghan followed the smalls squirrel to a booth table. They sat across from each other and looked at the menus. Well Jack did, Meghan however, had a smile on her muzzle.

"Aren’t you going to look at the Menu Meghan?" Jack asked, peering over the top of his at the almost bouncing Hybrid. She shook her head hastily.

"I already know what I’m gonna get!"

Jack smiled and looked that the menu and picked a basic noodle bowl with shrimp. Sometimes the best thing to do it to keep it simple.

"Hey what can I get you both?" The waitress, a teenaged human girl asked.

"Gimme the Spicy Chicken pad Thai with the hot peppers! Oh! And water please” Meghan said, her tail flicking quickly in excitement.

"And may I have the Shrimp noodle bowl and a coke?" Jack said with a smile.

"Sure thing" the waitress said before disappearing.

The 2 of them chatted for a while as they waited for the food. Jack learned Meghan was 26, enjoyed video games, reading and watching ghost hunter shows. He told her how he liked to travel, reading and playing video games. When he mentioned that, she gave a big smile and suggested they play together and he agreed with that. After all you can only play games solo for so long before you want to play with others. When the food arrived Meghan's face lit up, and she gripped her chopsticks eagerly.  

"Ooo this is gonna be tasty!" she said wafting the smell of the food to herself.

Jack watched Meghan use her chopsticks expertly as he ate his own food quietly. The meal was delicious but he was more focused on his company. Sure, she was a bit of a messy eater but she was still pretty fun to hang out with, plus seeing side of her rather than the usual down to business girl was quite refreshing. As well this was a huge change from less than an hour ago. He didn't even try to initiate a conversation with her as she ate because she seemed so focused on her food. At the end, she let out a content sigh and sat back.

"Ohh that hit the spot Jack. I love eating Asian food, although it’s not as good as my mom's!” She said leaning back and patting her tummy softly. Jack nodded as he finished his food.

"It was quite good, and you use those chopsticks like a pro" he said before sipping his water.

Meghan nodded happily, "Yea my mama taught me how to use them, and she grew up in Hong Kong!" She looked at her phone and gave a slight "Meep!" before looking up at Jack. 

"We should get back to work! I have an Anon to meet at 2" She said before looking at the bill. Jack reached over and took it from her.

"Hey! I said I was gonna pay you back for talking with me and taking me to Jasmine!" She said, her fur fluffing out a bit.

"A gentleman doesn't make a pretty girl pay him back for doing the right thing, besides I don't think it was that big of a deal" Jack said placing his card in the bill book and handing it to the waitress.

"It was a big deal to me though" she said with a sad smile "I'll have to pay you back some other way later"

The waitress handed Jacks card back to him, so he and Meghan got up and left the restaurant, then got into her car. The ride back to the BHA headquarters was uneventful and they talked a bit more about How Meghan went to college majoring in "Interspecies relations". She said it was her passion learning about how humans and all the species of Anthros got along. Even after the car was parked, they kept talking about how different parts of the world reacted to Anthros. As they neared their cubicles, Meghan stopped and sniffed the air for a moment

"Uhh one sec! Go to your cube and I'll meet you over there" she said before rushing off. Jack stood dumbfounded for a moment, then shrugged and went to their cubicles. He didn't know why, but he peeked into her cube first, and was disheartened to see a sticky note with the words "Half Breed" stuck to her monitor. Angrily, he pulled it off and crumpled the offending piece of paper and threw it into his trash can so Meghan wouldn't see it.

"Jack! There was some cake in the break room! I got us some!" Meghan said happily as she entered his cube carrying 2 plates of vanilla cake. 

"Thanks Meghan" Jack said as he took one from her.

"Oh and before I forget... here's my cell number, so we can play games together later" she said, scribbling her phone number on a sticky note and sticking it to Jack's chest.

"OK Meghan, I’ll be sure to give you a call" Jack said before turning to his computer. The sound of Meghan typing away, unaware of the Note that was left for her Made jack smile. She deserved that. Jack got back to work, thinking about the Fluffy hybrid and how best to keep her happy. Hopefully he could at least try.

Chapter 2: Into The Night

Jack drove home in his car, thinking about the day. He had gotten a lot done; he had helped an Anon get a job as a brewer’s assistant and helped another start up a band with some other musician Anons. Those weren't the highlights of his day though, the highlight was Meghan. The change in her was audible from his cube. He could hear more happiness in her voice and when work was over she give him a smile and a (albeit hesitant) hug with the words "Thanks Jack", He smiled in response and rubbed her ears, which earned a happy ear wiggle and a tighter hug. ALL Anthros love ear rubs, in Jack's many years living in this world he had yet to meet one who didn't.

Feeling somewhat responsible for Meghan's good mood, he had given her his number in response to her giving hers to him. No sooner had he pulled into his apartments parking lot had he gotten a text from her.

"Wanna play a game together? =^-^="

While he had planned to eat something and maybe watch TV, the thought of a game with a lovely lady was not something he could really say no to. Why would he anyway? Meghan was cute and fun to be around, so why wouldn't he? 

"Sure what do you wanna play" Jack texted back.

Sure he was tired, sure he just wanted to eat and relax, but there was something so eager in those words she sent him. Plus, he knew what she had gone through earlier, so he wasn't about to turn her down. The thought of the poor hybrid sitting at home alone, playing a game by herself because no one else would play with her, plagued the back of his mind.

"Do you have Slaughtersphere the game???" was her response. 

He didn't, but he wanted to let her down easy.

"I don't but whatever, maybe next time" he sent her back, hoping she would drop it.

Instead he got a quick response of "It's Ok! I’ll come over to your place and we can play together! I’ll bring pizza and beer and stuff!"

This made him pause, it was a Friday evening...And while he had wanted to just relax and possibly crash, instead he had a very eager Anthro wanting to hang out with him. True, he barely knew her, but the memory of her crying to herself invaded his mind. He sighed and texted her back.

"Alright my address is 451 Bolder ave, apt 431" 

He hoped he wouldn't regret this. Sharing an address with a co-worker could be risky...well, not really, right? How many summer barbecues had he passed up? How many company Christmas parties had he gone to, only to stay sober the whole time and skip the after party at someone's house? More than he wanted to admit, and despite his always turning the "main" event down, he always got invited, But... Even as he racked his memory for every event he had gone to... He couldn't recall Meghan ever being there. The thought hit him harder than he thought it would. The thought of Meghan sitting alone at home, playing games and drinking beer or wine on the night of the parties. The thoughts dug at him.

Eventually there was a knock on the sturdy door to his apartment, and Jack got up off his couch to open the door. 

"Coming coming" he called out as he walked to it.

When he opened it, he was met with the sight of Meghan wearing a purple tank top that looked a size too small, with a black bra underneath it and black shorts that allowed her fluffy tail to flicker side to side lazily. She was attempting to balance 2 pizza boxes, a bag with a bulge like cans and a few bottles of something were in it, her purse, and a game disc, all in one paw, while she knocked with the other. Jack couldn't help but chuckle a bit as he relieved her of some of her burdens.

"Hey Meghan, Welcome to my humble abode" he said calmly, ushering her inside as he took the bag, which clinked ominously while she moved the remaining objects to her free paw. Jack shut the door behind her as she walked in, and turned to see her looking around the living room / entry area of his apartment.

"Not much of a decorator huh?" she said with a smile, looking back at Jack.

It was true, Jack never really did take the time to get decorations for his apartment. Even when he traveled abroad he hadn’t thought about getting things from around the world for his place, he focused on work. Maybe he had missed the forest for the trees, or however it went. Still he wanted to move the focus away from him in this conversation.

"I thought you were just bringing pizza and beer? This looks like more than just pizza and beer" he said calmly, digging through the bag of drinks. True to her word, there was a brand of beer he hadn’t had before, "Get Hammered Ale" but there was also a bottle of vodka. Meghan gave a nervous smile as she kicked off her flip-flops and set down the pizza and her purse on the kitchen table.

Jack's apartment was a standard one bedroom place, the kitchen had a counter overlooking the Living room which also functioned as an entry area. A lone hallways lead down to a bedroom with his bathroom attached to it. While not glamourous, it was in a decent part of town and decently priced for him to live. Set in between the Anthro district and the Human district, Jack felt most at home there. Seeing a Mix of humans and Anthros everyday reminding him of home, the Mother who raised him and the father who tried.

"Yea I did say that" Meghan says, wrinkling her nose at him "But I dunno what brand of beer you like! So I got Vodka! Plus that way we can play Slaughtersphere and take shots for whoever dies!"

Her tail flicked behind her as she spoke, and Jack could see she was trying to gauge his reaction to her words. To him it looked like she was getting ready for rejection, like she had tried to be friendly before only to get shut down. He nodded at her instead, and began setting the drinks aside.

"By the way, I hope you have chasers Jack, I can do straight vodka, but I prefer a soda after" she said as she walked to his PlayBox5 and put the disc for Slaughtersphere into it. For a moment, he was mesmerized by her hips, which stretched the fabric of her shorts; and although it was partially shrouded by her very fluffy tail, Jack could tell her had just the right curves. Still, he didn't let himself linger too long on his houseguest though.

"Yea I got some Dr.Pepper™, I hope you don't mind that" He said as he went to his fridge, opened it and peered inside. It was at this moment that he noticed just how barren his fridge actually was. No real food, some leftover Chinese from who knows how long ago. Seems like having Meghan over with some pizza might have saved him momentarily from starvation.

He stood and and closed his fridge then watched momentarily as Meghan grabbed a piece of pizza and started chomping on it as she looked at him with a happy smile.

"Dr.Pepper™ is perfect! Come on! Let’s play!" she says happily as she put the pizza slice in her mouth and held it with her teeth, leaving her paws free to grab one of the cans of beer and a controller. Jack couldn't help but smile at the enthusiasm, how couldn't he? There she was, gripping a piece of pizza and a Playbox Controller. It was like a nerd's dream come true. A lovely lady, drinking and playing video games with him. Even as she made a face of disgust from drinking the beer, she looked at him with a smile.

"I've never really played this before" she said with a coy smile, her tongue partially out of her mouth.

Jack opened up a can of the beer, and while granted, it wasn't "His brand"; It was free beer, provided by a Fuzzy woman who was willing to play a game with him. The company was more than welcome in this case. Thinking back, when he had people he got along with at work, if they invited them over, most simply drunk themselves to oblivion, rather than try to have a good time with him.

Perhaps that’s what made Meghan so different from the others. While yes, she wanted to drink and have fun with him, she wanted to have fun first and get drunk second. Flashes of college parties flooded Jack's head as he picked up his controller and grabbed a slice of pizza then sat down next to her on his couch. College had been college, drunken parties, attempting to hook up with Girls, the whole shebang.  All things he didn't miss.

He ate a bit of his pizza as the game system booted up and started the game. He didn't know where Meghan had gotten the pizza but it was good, so why did it matter?

"I don't usually play spooky games" Meghan said before sipping her beer a bit "But I figured playing with someone would be more fun"

Jack nodded at he ate his pizza, he didn't usually play scary games either, too many focused on jump scares rather than build up. Slaughtersphere looked like the odd exception to the rule, and it allowed co-op in its FPS playstyle.

"OH! Go get the vodka and some cups and the Chasers! We’re gonna see just how good you are at games" She said happily as she selected "Hard" on the games start up screen for its difficulty. Jack smiled as she got the game set up for them and he got the drinks ready. Two shot glasses, a few cans of Dr.Pepper™ and the bottle of vodka are all they needed.

"Perfect! Let’s get to this then!" Meghan said, her fluffy tail swishing behind her.

The two of them played together and the drinks flowed a bit, and true to Meghan’s Rule, both of them took a shot when their respective character died. Meghan had a bit more than Jack but was still cheery despite dying quite a bit more than him. Her happy smile fueling him on more as they played and drank together, Even though she was very very drunk. The vodka bottle laid nearly empty on the table now as they continued playing together. 

What started as Meghan across the couch from him, ended with her and all her glorious fluff pressed against him. Jack pretended not to notice her inching closer with each video game death and shot from the start of the play session. Eventually, just her being next to him, a confident smile on her face, like she had somehow duped him into thinking she was still across the couch. How could he miss that fluffy tail though? At first, wrapped around herself and the tip in her mouth between shots as she focused; now it was around him like a spectacular fuzzy hug.

"The Snoon Wins!" Meghan cried out as Jack died again, mainly due to her hanging back and letting him attempt to shoulder a co-op boss on his own.

"Snoon?" Jack asked casually as he poured himself another drink, noting her ears folding down as he asked as he drank it deftly.

"Uh... yea Snoon, My Mother is Snow leopard from Hong Kong and my father is a raccoon from the US" She said, almost hazy in her speech. "Now! Drink your Bone hurting Juice" She said as she poured Jack yet another shot of the Vodka.

As Jack looked at Meghan, she seemed out of it; a far off look in her eyes as she looked at the screen of the TV. He could see what had happened, she was black out drunk at this point. Even though she was answering questions and being friendly, she wouldn't remember tomorrow. Best to finish this night off the right way then.

Jack slowly walked in front of Meghan and turned off the video game console, flicking it off as Meghan tried to lean around him to see the screen.

"Oh BOO!" She said with mock anger in her voice as he walked to her, her violet eyes locked on his in a fierce battle of who would control the night. Jack broke away on purpose though, letting her think she won. She was far drunker than he was and letting her have this little concession would help her feel better. Although it was obvious she was in no condition to drive home, Jack didn't mind letting the "Snoon" stay over for the night.

To him, it looked like she needed a night like this, an evening of forgetting her sadness. Tonight she was just a normal girl, hanging out with a friend, having a good time. 

"Come on Meghan, I think you've had enough, let’s get you to bed" Jack said in his usual calming voice as rain began  to fall outside. How many times had Jack used this voice to comfort drunk sorority girls? How many nights of wishing from something more than a quick lay and instead getting the same thing each time; some drunken girl, human or Anthro, laying in his bed for nothing more than moments reprieve from their own lust? That was how all those guys got accused of rape, and miss him them lawsuits. That’s what was on his mind as he let them sleep in his bed, in the clothes from the night before while he slept on the couch of his college frat house.

Thankfully, his silken voice worked, drawing the very drunk Meghan to him and his outstretched arms. She stumbled and fell into his arms in a tight hug that tightened more than he expected.

"MMMMM You're so nice, I'm glad you picked me" She mumbled, pulling Jack surprisingly close, her breasts pressed against his midsection and her long think tail slowly wrapping around him.

"Picked you? What are you talking about Meghan?" he sputtered out, both enjoying the tight hug, but not wanting to give the wrong idea.

"I mean...You were only nice to me to get at me right?" She murmured, her eyelids half open and her speech slurred. "You didn't even get turned off that Ima hybrid" She mumbled to him.

A thousand thoughts raced through Jack's head. Other guys hit on her before and rejected her? Did she think he was only being nice to get in her pants? How could he convince her to sleep without getting in trouble? An issue to deal with, but not right yet.

"Come on, let’s get you into the bathroom and to bed" Jack said, wiggling out of her hug and pulling an arm around her waist to guide her gently to the bathroom. She thankfully accepted his guidance to the bathroom, although she's giggled happily as he did.

"Ooook Jack, I’ll get all ready for you while you get the bedroom ready" she giggled as he ushered her into the bathroom.

"Ok Meghan, please don't fall" He said as she giggled and closed the door to the bathroom.

Getting the bedroom ready? Right now, that meant getting water for her to drink in the morning, and maybe grabbing a spare pillow for himself to sleep on the couch. Jack busied himself, grabbing a large bottle he usually saved for workouts and filled it for Meghan. He didn’t know how long Meghan would be in the bathroom "getting ready". Quickly, he went to his bedroom and placed it on his bedside table, ready for the inevitable hangover that Meghan was going to be burdened with.

"Readyyyyy!" Came the slurred speech from his bathroom door as it creaked open.

Jack looked over and froze, speechless at the sight in front of him. Meghan stood leaning against the doorframe with a happy smile on her muzzle, her shorts and shirt were on the floor of the bathroom behind her as she stood in her lacey black panties and a bra that looked a bit too small. A Belly button ring glinted in the light as she strode towards Jack, albeit a little shakily.

"Like what you see Mr. Jack?" She said, her voice wavering slightly as she looked at him. 

"I Do Meghan, but let’s get you to bed" He said, lifting the covers for her.

She stood still for a moment, looking him up and down as he attempted to coax her into the bed.

"What's wrong Jack, am I Not sexy?" She struggled to say as she stumbled slightly and tripped forwards, causing Jack to drop the blankets and catch her. 

"Ooo someone finally puts their hands on meeeee" Meghan mumbled as Jack stood her upright and lead her to the bed. As he led her, he focused on the bed, not the giggling, bubbly Snoon.

He didn't notice her paws until they held something out in front of his face, which caught his attention. In front of his face, dangling from one of her paw's claws was Meghan's bra. He Gulped quickly and tried his hardest not to peek, but his own thoughts betrayed him as his eyes darted to her bust. Her breasts, now exposed and perfectly sized, here covered in light brown fur and both of her Nipples had small barbells through them. Jack felt a bit of relief, as he got her to the side of the bed and she got into it without issue.

"Come On, Don't keep me waiting" she half moaned, half mumbled as one of her paws traced down her stomach and to her panties.

"I can't Meghan, not like this anyway, get some sleep" Jack said, pulling up the blankets over her.

"You think I'm an ugly mutt too, don't you?" she uttered as he stood up.

He looked deep into her eyes and saw the sadness behind them. 

"Of course I don't think you're ugly or a mutt Meghan, you’re beautiful, but you're drunk" He said, rubbing a hand on the side of her muzzle and face, stroking the soft fur that covered it.

"Promise?" She said as her paws wrapped themselves around his hand. For a moment, Jack thought he saw a moment of clarity in her eyes, which no longer had a look of sadness, but one of hope.

"Promise" he said to her, moving his hand to her ears and rubbing them gently as he sat down on the bed next to her. 

"Mmmm ok" Meghan yawned as her eyes started to flicker closed.

Eventually she was sound asleep, breathing softly and with a small smile on her face. Ear rubs always did do the trick. Silently Jack stood up and began turning off the lights in his apartment, thinking about Meghan. She was cute and nice that's for sure, but it wasn’t right to try and take advantage of her in her inebriated state. Would she still like him in the morning like that? Who knows? The thoughts of her and her body swam in his head as he laid down on the couch and fell asleep himself shortly after.

Chapter 3: High Hopes

Jack awoke to sunlight streaming through his window, with a few birds bouncing along tree branches outside. No doubt they were working on making a nest full of shed Anthro fur to keep their eggs warm. Jack sat up slowly and looked around his small apartment. It's just as Meghan said, he was no decorator; but having her point it out made him more self-conscious about it. He would have to do something about it later, because now was the time for damage control. Namely managing Meghan's inevitable hangover.

He stood up and stretched, earning a choir of pops and creaks from all over his body. First things first, checking on the inebriated, and probably still half naked Snoon. Walking to his bedroom door, he slowly opened it and peeked into the darkness within, then waited for his eyes to adjust. He had always enjoyed having blackout curtains in his bedroom because his window faced the east, meaning he would always be woken up first thing if he didn't have them.

Now however, they were more to prevent any extra pain on the behalf of Meghan, who laid on his bed amongst scattered blankets. Still topless and breathing softly, it looked like she had at some point grabbed the water bottle Jack had left her and drank most of it. Jack couldn't help but admire her body, even though he knew it was wrong to look at her like this. Supple breasts, nipple piercings that glinted the light and a soft tummy usually concealed beneath loose fitting clothing.

Jack tore his eyes away from the spectacle that was her beauty, focusing instead on the water bottle. Sure, she had drank a bunch of water in the night, but she would still have a hell of a hangover, although a lesser one. He quickly grabbed the bottle and left the room, preferring to be out of the room of the half-naked Anthro. Sure, he could look all he wanted at this point, but it would be wrong and he would feel disgusted with himself for ogling a defenseless girl. Sure, she had come onto him hard, but she didn't deserve to have her dignity stripped away by prying eyes.

"Just a matter of time" Jack muttered to himself as he left the room and walked to the kitchen. She would wake up soon, and feel miserable; either she would be heavily hungover and have forgotten about stripping down in front of him, or she would be heavily hungover and remember stripping in front of her coworker. Which would be worse? It’s hard to say honestly; on one hand it would make the interactions with her simple, she would just be blackout drunk and forget stripping, or she would remember. That brought a whole new line of problems, would she remember and hate herself? Would she remember and hate him for not acting? Or would she remember and thank him for not taking advantage of her?

"Jackkk?" came a loud groan from the bedroom as Jack walked through his apartment, guess so many years living alone had caused his ability to sneak around to suffer.

"Yes Meghan?" he called out.

"I-I think" came unsteady speech, followed by shuffling footsteps out into his living room "I think I might have overdone the vodka" The Snoon groaned finally, collapsing on Jack's sofa, slumping back into the cushions in anguish while covering her eyes, with her fluffy tail.

"Why is it so bright out here?" she moaned pitifully, trying to shield her eyes from the sunlight pouring through.

Meghan didn't have her own shirt on at this point, she had tossed it and her bra somewhere into a corner of Jacks apartment, so now instead she wore one of Jack's old t-shirts. "STEXKNOK" was the solid white lettering on a Black t-shirt, sure, it was one of Jack's favorite shirts from his favorite band, but somehow seeing Meghan in it was seductive.

As Meghan leaned back against the couch with one of her armed raised, he noted how her nipples, and their piercings were VERY visible through the t-shirt. How many times would he have to pull himself away from looking at her? It was a totally different feeling from work. At work, she just kinda was there, a slightly chubby and cute Anthro who at times tried those odd workout fads, like sitting on a giant inflatable ball, but here in his t-shirt and nothing else, it was adorable and sexy.

Quickly going to the window and closing the blinds and curtains, Jack turned back to the hungover Snoon with a bit of pity. How many times had he been in that same position? His mother never limited his alcohol intake when he was younger; she said a person should make their own decisions at life. What resulted was Jack being able to drink from a young age but not throw parties like so many of the other people in his age group, sure people showed up to them, but his parties couldn't compare to everyone elses. The Yeens threw great parties that usually ended with the cops getting called, the lions had parties turned orgies, and Jack...he had alcohol. People showed up, drank and had a good time, but how many were his friend in the end? Not many it turned out.

Thoughts for another time though. Jack went to his kitchen, disliking the feeling of cold linoleum under his feet but putting up with it to make some food. Filling the water bottle once more, his stomach growled slightly, making him painfully aware how hungry he was.

"Meghan want some foo-" he called out to the Hungover Anthro, only to stop mid-sentence. The food. He had no food in his fridge. His mind wandered quickly, thinking of nearby places for quick meals. Breakfast burritos stuck out to him at the moment, greasy steak meals with great hot sauce filled his mind and his hunger.

"Want some breakfast burritos? I’ll run out and grab some if you like" he asked her, setting down the now full water bottle. Gathering his wallet, phone and car keys from the small table near his front door he quickly pocketed all three. When he looked back at Meghan he saw her looking at him, still leaned back with an arm over her muzzle, but with one of her deep purple eyes locked on him. 

"I. would. LOVE A BURRITO! NO GIMME 2!" She yelled excitedly, bouncing in excitement with her hangover forgotten, which startled Jack slightly. What caused this outburst? It was cute that she was now bouncing excitedly on his sofa, seemingly recovered from her hangover, but was it necessary? As soon as the outburst started though, it ended with a moan and Meghan reaching over to get the now filled water bottle on the kitchen counter, however she couldn't quite reach from the couch, and an angry groan at her lack of reach. Jack took pity on her and grabbed it for her and put it into her outstretched paw. 

"Ok, I’ll go grab us some steak burritos, I'll be right back" he said as she took the bottle and drank from it.

"Kay...Thanks Jack" Meghan said as she lowered the bottle from her lips and gave him a faint smile.

Jack left Meghan in his apartment and walked down the stairs, thinking about Meghan, food, and her coming onto him and her following disappointment.

"You think I'm an ugly mutt too, don't you?"

Her words echo back to him like a broken record as he got into his car and started driving. She wasn't ugly at all, nor was she a mutt. Well she was a hybrid, but not a mutt, that made it seem so negative. No, she was a pretty Anthro, and seeing her in this new light, not as an office co-worker, but as a friend. 

Before long, Jack arrived at his restaurant of choice; "Burrito Bandito". It was a small hole in the wall place that was owned by a very large black man who everyone just called "T”, and his Bear wife. It always seemed like no matter what time of day Jack went here, it was open and T was in the back making burritos. It almost seemed like he lived there.

"Eyyy its Jack! You want the usual brother?" T called out from the kitchen as Jack walked in. 

"Yea T, Plus 2 steak breakfast burritos, I got company at home" Jack responded with a smile and short wave.  T Peeked out of the kitchen and looked Jack over.

"A LADY friend?" He asked simply, raising both his eyebrows in anticipation.

"A lady who is a friend" Jack responded, trying hard to emphasize on "friend".

"Oh hell yea buddy, Ima make these burritos fucking bomb then" T said before disappearing behind a wall. Jack heard the satisfying sound of meat sizzling as it hit the stove and the smell of cooking meat mixed with various spices wafted through the air. Jack sat down at a nearby table and pulled out his phone for a bit of time killing. Scrolling through PawsApp, the social media of choice for Anthros and some humans, he saw Meghan had sent him a friend request. Was it wise to accept it? Would it be professional to add a co-worker? His thumb decided for him as it hit the accept button as he pondered accepting.

Might as well snoop around a bit right? She was probably doing the exact same thing now anyway. As he scrolled through, he noticed lots of selfies; her at home in her apartment, at the local docks looking at fresh fish, stuff like that. But there were almost no pictures of her with other people. There were a few with her family, and a few formal graduation pictures, but nothing else.

Poor girl...No wonder she latched onto Jack the moment he showed her kindness, but then again looking at some of the pictures of her "Modeling" various outfits, he couldn't complain about it.

"Here ya go Jack, Piping hot Burritos for you and your lady!" T said, thrusting a brown paper bag into Jack's face, causing him to jump slightly. He was so engrossed looking at Meghan's pictures that he had zoned out, focusing not on his surroundings but on the pictures of the Snoon before him.

"T-Thanks T" Jack stammered as he stood and went to the register, pulling out his wallet. He paid and earned an enthusiastic "Thank you for your business" before getting back into his car and heading back to his apartment. As he drove the enticing smell of the burritos made his stomach growl louder. God damn T and his addicting food. Jack resisted the urge to grab a burrito and dig in while driving, instead opting to get the food to its final destination. 

It didn't take long for him to drive back to his apartment and then walk up the stairs to it. Even as he opened the door to his apartment, he didn't expect much. What Jack found though, was Meghan, one paw holding the water bottle, and the other scrolling through pictures on her phone. All of the apartment lights had been turned off and Meghan sat in the dark, looking at her phone while lying on the coach. Her ears perked up at Jacks arrival, and her eyes moved to look at him as soon as he entered the apartment.

"Uh... I got food for us" he said with a smile, holding up the brown paper bag. Her muzzle and face lit up in a happy smile at the sight of the bag.

"Is that from Burrito Bandito?! Those are my favorite burritos!" she said staring at the bag with a happy smile

"Yep, I got you 2 like you asked for" Jack said sitting down on the couch next to the fluffy Snoon. Her tail wrapped around his waist as she dug into the bag for a burrito.

"Ooo that smells so good! T makes the Best burritos" she said before biting into hers and chewing happily
"Mmmm Thash good" she mumbled to herself as she chewed.

Jack smiled as he opened his own burrito, noticing that hers had a bit more steak and cheese. Did T make her burritos better by adding a bit more? Either way Meghan seemed happy. As they eat together, savoring the food and the company, an odd sound Jack couldn't pinpoint was heard. A low rumbling? What was it? It took a moment for him to realize that it was in fact coming from Meghan.

"Meghan... are you...purring?" He asked delicately, not wanting to harm her self esteem.

"uhm...Yea.... Sorry I’ll stop if its-" she started

"NO! I mean No, don't stop, it’s cute" he said cutting her off "I...I like it, just wasn't expecting it". Her ears perked up at that.

"Cute? Me? Even after I made a fool of myself last night?" she asked in surprise, nearly dropping her burrito from her startled jump.

"I won't hold that against you, besides, we were playing Slaughtersphere and we were playing shots on death" He said between bites of his meal.

Meghan looked down of a moment, staring at her burrito before looking up at Jack.

"Would...Would you ever consider dating someone...like me?" she asked hesitantly, then shutting her eyes hard as if in anticipation of a scolding or insult. Jack thought about it for a moment, as far as he could see there was no downside to dating her, just some company for him and for her, plus who knows? It might lead to something more.

"Well Yea, Meghan, I don't really know you all that well, but you seem nice enough. and us being together would fix that" he replied casually, chewing on a bit of leftover steak that had fallen from his burrito into the paper wrapper. Meghan’s eyes snapped open and she looked at him hard.

"Wait... seriously? Like not a prank or joke?" She said in disbelief. This took Jack by surprise slightly, had that happened before?

"Uh yea seriously Meghan" He said with a confused smile. He purple eyes grew wide and a bright smile painted her muzzle.

"YAY!" she said suddenly, pouncing onto Jack in a hug. "I can't believe I got an awesome guy like you for my first boyfriend!"

First? That took Jack By surprise but he wasn't going to question it as he hugged her back.

"Can we have a date night?! Can we go to the Movies!? Can we play more SlaughterSphere?" she asked excitedly into his chest.

"We can do all that Meghan, let's just try to avoid more hangovers" he said, rubbing her ears gently with a thumb and forefinger. This increased the purring from the Snoon as she looked up at him with those beautiful purple eyes.

"I'm glad I met someone like you Jack" she purred happily, nuzzling into his chest.

"I’m glad I met you too Meghan" he said with a smile. Maybe this would all be ok.



Chapter 4: Come Hang out

A few weeks had passed since Jack and Meghan had started "dating". The term dating was used loosely by Jack because well, nothing really happened. Sure, they hung out more and they spent a lot more time together; but it wasn't like any other relationship he had been in. It was just a lot of hanging out, watching movies, playing video games, and...Drinking, together.

Presently Jack's eyes rested, entirely unfocused on his work computer screen as he thought about it. Meghan was fun and cute, but ever since the first night where she got too drunk, she had been reserved during their time together. Sure, he had learned a lot about her, She was 26, an only child, and wanted to be an actress before reality set in and she realized no one wanted a hybrid for any parts. It almost hurt Jack physically thinking about it; to be perfectly qualified for something, yet unable to get a job because of one's heritage.

Now wasn't the time to think about that as he stared at his computer screen, looking at various Anonymous members. It was easier said than done getting people jobs unfortunately. How do you get someone a job when their main profession in their past life was animation? Sure the current animation industry was shit, but shoving a new animator in, that was a recipe for another disaster of a show like "Steven Whatshisface". Jack rubbed his temples as he looked at his computer screen, seeing the interactive chat between the animation studio and the fledgling animator get heated in an argument.

"Fuck it" Jack groaned to himself in annoyance as he cut the feed to both the animator and the studio; he would chalk it up to government internet and apologize tomorrow, letting both sides cool down a bit. This was actually a common tactic he used. Sometimes things got a little too rowdy, so moderators (like him) would end it, rather than let tempers escalate. Both sides needed to see that they were both being unreasonable. In this case, the studio needed to recognize it wasn't dealing with a rookie, and the animator needed to recognize that his prior work didn't count here. 

As Jack drafted emails he would send to both parties apologizing for the terrible internet, he saw a couple of his co-workers leaning against his cubicle wall. Justin and Matt, a human and reptile of some sort respectively, were leaning against his cubicle wall, sipping coffee with smug grins.

"Hey Jack" Matt, some generic species of reptile, said after sipping his coffee with his tongue.

"We're having a late Halloween party, and you're invited" Justin, the human, said calmly.

Jack had always gotten along better with Justin, Matt always acted like he had something to prove, like he DIDN'T need to stop working for close to 2 hours a day to sit in the sun like the worthless idiot he was. Jack wasn't speciest, by no means was he at all. He had worked with gator Anthros and Caimans before without issue. Matt however, was entitled, lazy, and worst of all, thought he deserved special treatment.

"I'll be there next time" Jack said absentmindedly as he proofread the drafts.

"You always say that Jack" Matt said with a frown "come on man, you can't be all work and no play".

""I'll be there next time, I’ll be there next time" you're like a broken record, comeon man, it's the holidays, let loose a bit" Justin pleaded with a calm half smile. His voice was enough to make Jack look up from his screen to see their faces. Matt still looked smug, but Justin was smiling calmly in an almost pleading sense, which quickly shifted to annoyance.

"Come on Jack, you never really hang out with us" Justin said again, annoyedly. Jack liked and respected Him enough to look at him with a small smile and a hopeful glance.

"Can I bring someone along at least" Jack said with a grin.

Matt raised his "eyebrows" if he had any, in surprise. 

"Who? Do you have a girlfriend? Or boyfriend, not judging" he said questioningly.

"Girlfriend, And I'll be bringing her then" Jack said with a bit of annoyance. 

Some people in the office thought he was gay, just because he turned down one of the anthro ladies that he worked with for sex. For fucks sake, don't show interest in the office "whore”, who was just a poor anthro female in heat, and get labeled as a queer. No regards for trying to treat a female with respect, even if she pleaded to get pulled into a broom closet and fucked.

"Heh, ok, we'll see you then Jack" Justin said with a pleasant smile. They had always gotten along a bit better than most, mainly because they didn't pry into each other’s personal lives. Honestly Jack was surprised when Justin invited him to a baby shower with his wife. He hadn't even known Justin was married...

Either way, the two pulled away, probably to strong arm more people into this office party.  Meanwhile, Meghan scooted her chair back to look at Jack in concern.

"Jack...are you ... are you planning on taking me to this party?" she said, making a staple remover "talk" to him as she spoke, like it was the person talking to him instead of herself; seemingly out of nerves.

"Yea, why wouldn't I bring you along?" he said calmly, lounging back in his comfy office chair "you are my girlfriend after all".

"Oh uh...I’m just, not really liked because of... you know" she said with the staple remover, inching closer to him as she made it chomp down.

"Yea and I don't care because fuck 'em" Jack said with a smile, leaning back and stretching calmly. He really didn't mean fuck them in a malicious sense, more of a "who cares what they think" kind of sense. After all their opinions of him were nothing to really worry about. 

"But they are usually so... Mean to me" Meghan said, finally dropping the staple remover and letting her ears droop a bit. Scootching her chair right up next to his.

"Well if they are mean this time, we can just leave and play games or something at my place" Jack reassured her, thinking about how much nicer the weekend would be with just him and her playing video games together. No trying to impress fake work friends, no trying to show off to the women at work in a desperate attempt to get laid. None of that, Jack just wanted a nice slow evening with Meghan. One of video games, a movie, bad junk food, a bit of alcohol and snuggles, and maybe even some comfy sex.

Meghan was gorgeous and sexy in every way to him; her body would put the goddess Aphrodite to shame, but she didn't come onto him as much in a "strip down and try to fuck him" sense. She now wore tight clothing and was much more physical than before. More hugs, more kisses and more pressing her curvaceous body against him.

Jack found it very hard to ignore her and her unique displays of affection for mundane things. Tight teasing hugs when he did something so simple for her; like pay for movie tickets for the both of them. That earned the armrest between them going up and her wrapped around his arm for the whole movie and her breasts also wrapped around his arm, proving that she hadn't had a bra on the entire time.

There was also the time they went out for a simple dinner together, for a "first date" kind of moment. He took her out for her favorite food, Chinese; to the most authentic Chinese food place within 50 miles. She was of course, delighted at the prospect of it, yet when they got there, she insisted on sitting next to him, wrapping her soft fluffy tail around him and nuzzling against him as he ate and fed her. Yes, she asked him to feed her, and honestly it was quite cute, feeding her with shaky chopsticks and a hand under her chin to catch any dropped food. 

"Jack? You really mean it?" Came Meghan's voice snapping him from his thought train. She was leaned against him with a concerned look painting her muzzle, her ears drooped a bit.

"Yea, it would be a great night without the party, but it doesn't matter as long as I’m with you." Jack remarks casually, rubbing her ears softly.

Meghan gave a small reluctant smile in response to his.

"I... I just don't want to BE the reason they kick us out though" She murmured quietly, Jack waved that concern aside calmly.

"We'll be fine babe, besides if they kick us out, we get an evening like I really want; kisses, snuggles and video games" he said with a calm smile.

She finally smiled fully and flicked her tail happily.

"Ok! I got this outfit I want to wear that I haven't had a chance to!" She exclaimed happily, cuddling up to Jack further while softly purring. A new outfit? Jack could only contemplate for a moment what she had in mind to wear before she slide away back to her desk.

"Ohh I'm so excited! I never go to parties!" She babbled happily, swaying side to side and making her tail wave quickly with her motion. Jack smiled happily at the excitement and went back to working for the next few hours until it was time to go home. So Jack and Meghan left together, casually chatting before she parted from him to go to her car.

"Pick me up at 9 Jack! I’ll be ready then!" Meghan called out happily, then did a few happy skips to get the rest of the way to her car. Jack smiled at the adorable display and then got into his own car and started the drive to his apartment. Rolling his windows down, he breathed in the crisp, cool autumn air and sighed. Going to a party might be a bad idea, but he was determined to have an evening with Meghan. The option to not go at all was there of course, but they needed to socialize a bit and not just hang out at the apartment. Maybe he could take her to the boardwalk or up to the snowy mountains, get the Snow leopard side of her out and playing in the snow.

It wasn't long before he reached his place and sauntered in lazily. Going to his bedroom, he changed into more comfortable clothing and then plopped down on his couch. There were about 3 hours until he would need to leave and pick up Meghan, so he turned on his PlayBox 720 and played a bit of Blood Souls to pass the time. Nothing like some good old Ultraviolence to pass the time. 

However even that had to come to an end, as the time to leave and pick up Meghan, who had been texting him while he played games. Most of it was memes and silly pictures, plus the occasional ribald bit of humor from her. It was refreshing to say the least, a change of pace to have someone to talk to. 

Jack got up, grabbed his leather jacket, and then walked casually out his apartment and to his waiting car. He knew the route to Meghan's condo by now, they sometimes spent evenings at her place; mainly to avoid Jack's loud neighbors who didn't realize that the walls were paper thin and no one wanted to hear their guttural moans. 

The drive is quick and painless, not too many cars were out and about at that time on a Friday, most people had settled in for the evening. That suited Jack just fine, less people and their inability to drive in a straight line. Pulling up to Meghan’s place, he stopped the car and walked up to her front door and then let himself in.

"Meghan! I’m here! Ready to go babe?" he called out as he looked around. She decorated with a lot of Chinese artwork and framed movies posters; a few of which were signed by the respective actors.

"One sec Jack! I’ll be right down!" came the happy chime from somewhere upstairs.

Jack sighed and sat down on her almost overly plush couch. Women, no matter the species, always take a little bit to get ready it seems. To kill time, Jack pulled out his phone and scrolled through the boards of his favorite "underwater basket weaving" forum. A few threads about Human and anthro relationships were up about how humans can best to surprise their Anthro mates; that brought back memories for sure.

Back in college his friend, Chris, had been dating a lovely bobcat anthro who was super fun at parties. Well, he decided to throw her a surprise party for her birthday, much to Jacks chagrin. Jack knew how most predator anthros respond to loud noises and a sudden change in light levels. Of course Chris ignored Jack's advice and threw it anyway. The result was exactly as Jack predicted; the loud "SURPRISE" and the light turning on quickly caused her to panic and jump the thing closest to her, which just happened to be Chris. Long story short, he needed multiple stitches in multiple locations.

"Jack? Ready?" Meghan said quietly, snapping Jack from his nostalgia. He hastily got to his feet and then looked to Meghan only to be rendered speechless at the sight of her.

Meghan stood before him in a black sweater dress, commonly known as the "Virgin killer sweater". It hugged her sides and body tight, and contoured to her breasts so perfectly he could faintly see the barbells of her nipple piercings. A small handbag hung loosely from her arm as she looked at him apprehensively.

"How do I look?" she questioned nervously, looking up at him for any form of reassurance.

Jack however stood speechless, mouth slightly agape staring at her. Her hair had the signature purple streaks re dyed, her claws were painted a deep violet, even the ones of her footpaws, which stuck out of tight open toed high heels. Even her fur and tail had been brushed and washed in what he could only assume was the best fur shampoo.

"Oh... uh I’ll go change" she said after Jack didn't answer, her ears and tail drooping in sadness.

"Whoa no no no!" Jack cried out, raising his hands and rushing to stop her. "You look absolutely GORGEOUS"

Her ears instantly stood up at those words.

"You mean it?!" she exclaimed, bouncing slightly in happiness, only to lose her balance and fall over because of the high heels.  

Jack rushed forward once more and caught her before she hit the ground. With her in his arms her beamed at her.

"Yes I mean it"

Meghan’s face was a mixture of happiness and ecstasy as she looked up at him.

"Ok Jack, let's go to this party" she said boldly, her previous nervousness gone and her tail slowly wrapping around him. Jack quickly got her to her feet and smiled at her, his arms still around her.

"You look amazing" He said again, looking her up and down once more. Her ears fluttered quickly as she hugged him tight.

"I'm glad you like it, I wanna make those work bitches jealous I got Iron Jack!" she said with a smile. This baffled from for a second.

"Wha?... Iron Jack?" He said in confusion, looking at her incredulously.

"Uh... the ladies, mainly us anthro gals, call you Iron Jack after you rejected Desiree's attempt to get you to fuck her when she was in heat" Meghan said sheepishly "Ya know, because you were unwavering in your morals or something like that. I didn't come up with it!"

Pondering this for a moment, Jack wondered if it really was that big a deal to not take advantage of a lady in heat. To him it would be the same as taking advantage of a drunk girl. Because of his morals he earned a nickname? Because he just wanted to find a good relationship and Meghan happened to mesh with him right, she won some weird female competition? He scratched his head in confusion as he looked at her.

"I'm a trophy or something?" he said finally. Meghan looked a bit uneasy as she answered.

"Kiiiinnnda? The anthro ladies knew you were into us girls by your smell and wanted to prove they got you...but you never bothered with them at all. I....I never even tried...You were the unbreakable human, and I was the ugly hybrid..." she said with a bit of remorse.

Jack processed this for a moment, recalling just how so many Anthro ladies had called him to their cubes for "Technical issues" even though he wasn't IT. Then they asked him to crawl under their desks to check cables, only for him to turn around and see they weren't wearing panties; then there were annoying passes where they came to him saying shit like "Ooo oops I took your lunch, can I take you out instead?" which only annoyed him because it was usually food clearly labeled.

They were coming onto him in the worst possible fashion it seemed, trying to provoke a reaction in him rather than just... talking to him, like a human- err person. And by a random chance of fate, Meghan just happened to be the most approachable because of the others being mean to her. Irony he guessed.

"You aren't ugly Babe, now come on, let's make all those gals jealous of you" Jack said, ushering her out the door to your car.  He felt woefully underdressed compared to how she looked. he was wearing his black "StexKnok" shirt, the same one she wore that morning when she was at his place, a brown leather jacket and jeans. However, Meghan's alacrity at going to a party with him quickly drove all those thoughts from his head. Instead, he focused on her, the sway of her hips, the swish of her tail and the softness of it when it barely brushed against the little bit of his exposed neck.

Getting to the car first, he opened the door for her, feeling now was the best time to be a gentleman, and still feeling like this was an odd kind of beauty in the beast esque moment. 

"Such a gentleman" She teased, letting her soft tail brush his face as she got into the car delicately, setting her little handbag into her lap. Jack strode over to the driver’s side and got in, then pulled out his phone to get directions to the party, which seemed to be at Matt's parents house.

Matt's parents had done very well for themselves; Jack couldn't quite recall how they made their fortune, but he knew it was immense and that their house was gigantic. They also loved the work the BHA did, so they often let the company use it for corporate functions saying that the funds should got to the Anonymous members, not to renting out places. As such, one could hardly be surprised that they were the ones hosting this late holiday party. Even as Jack drove up to the house, He could scarcely even think to call it a house, as it was at least 5 stories tall and had a full swimming pool, tennis court, and basketball court on the grounds. Plus it looked like they even hired a valet for the occasion. 

"Here is your ticket to retrieve your car at the end of the evening sir" the Raccoon Valet said calmly as he handed Jack a small receipt. "If you find yourself unable to drive home at the end of the evening, there are many rooms for you to choose from, should you desire to spend the night" he added before getting into Jack's still running car and driving it off with it to who knows where.

Taking Meghan’s delicate paw into his hand, they walked side by side into the mansion, where music could already be heard. Opening the door for the gorgeous Snoon, Jack let her in first, then followed and surveyed the scene. Different kinds of music were emanating from different parts of the house, clashing a bit and causing a slight dissonance. A drone was flying around from room to room and Jack could hear the sounds of bottles clinking together as well of the telltale sounds of dance dance revolution. The aforementioned drone, zipped by Jack then stopped and "turned" towards him and Meghan, the camera on it looking at him as he looked back in confusion.

"AYYE JACK'S HERE" Came a yell from one of the rooms, then a slew of Jack's co-workers came pouring out of the room where some kind of mumble rap was playing. All had cups of various alcohols and a few were already staggering and slurring their words.

"Eyyy Its Jack! We weren't expecting you to even show!" Said Justin happily, setting a hand on Jack's shoulder in a gesture of friendliness, or was it to stop his swaying? Probably a bit of both. Matt, was next to him along with Bill from accounting, and a few others Jack recognized.

"So where's this girlfriend? I thought you were bringing a gir-" Matt started only for Jack to slip and arm behind Meghan’s back and pull her to him by her hips. God her fur was soft. Jack looked at them confidently while Meghan seemed to try to shrink away.

"Wait, Meghan? Really? She stooped down to date you?" Justin said, confusion filling his words. That hurt Jack's ego a bit but Meghan’s posture straightened up at those words.

"Stoop down? what do you mean? Jack is awesome!" She said in your defense.

"Yea yea, he's cool and all but LOOOOOK at your body" One of the more drunk men said loudly, motioning to Meghan’s very voluptuous curves. If Meghan could blush, Jack knew she would be.

"Hey uh, let us go get some drinks, ya’ll didn't all have to welcome us." Jack said, ushering the now thoroughly flustered Snoon through the group of assembled men.

"Uhh kitchen is just down that way, we got EVERYTHING! Mix up something nice and mingle Yo!" Called out Justin happily.

Jack felt Meghan's tail coyly creeping around him as they walked together, his arm still around her back, and sometimes under that virgin killer sweater to feel her extra soft tummy fur. He could feel her purrs starting to reverberate through her body and into what seemed his soul. In the kitchen, there were assorted Alcohols, and not cheap stuff either, VERY high quality Vodka, tequila, bourbon, whiskey and just about every other kind of hard liquor along with an assortment of beers. To say the kitchen was large would be an understatement, it was probably bigger than Jack's whole apartment and looked like it had a wine cellar attached to it.

"Ooh ohh I can mix drinks! I used to be a bartender!" Meghan giggled as she rushed out of Jack's grasp to the large "island" in the center of the luxurious kitchen. The absence of her by his side left him wanting, but he wasn't going to focus on that for now.

"What can I get for you SIR" she exclaimed to him from the opposite side of the island like it was a bar, emphasizing on the word "sir".

"I didn't know you were a bartender" Jack said, eyeing the large selection of drinks before making his selection. "and ,uh, just Dr.Pepper™ and some of the Kraken Rum" She looked a bit dejected, like she expected some fancy cocktail to mix up for him, but didnt voice it when she spoke.

"I was a bartender when I was trying to be an actress, had to pay the bills somehow" She said as she mixed the drink for him in a large glass and handing it to him.

"I expect a big tip from you" she teased, using her fluffy arms to push her large Breasts together with a wink. Jack instantly felt his face flush, so he quickly took a sip of his drink. Ahhh refreshing. Satisfied in making Jack flustered, Meghan then busied herself mixing together a something drink for herself, even going so far to crush the ice cubes that went into her cup.

"Anddd that’s how to make the perfect Long Island Iced Tea!" She exclaimed happily, holding the drink out for Jack to inspect. To him it looked like a regular Long Island Iced Tea, but he wasn't gonna push it.

He extended a hand to her which she took it delicately in her paw as they left the kitchen to explore the rest of the house. Most of it was what you would expect from a party; Guys playing pool in a dimly lit room holding glasses of whiskey and bourbon, a bunch of the more game savvy guys playing some vidoe games on a huge wall sized TV while drinks sit half-forgotten around them. Each door was like a portal to a new world, each scene so different. The only constants were alcohol and Jacks grip on his beautiful Snoon, who was plastered to his side, sipping her drink and whisking her tail against him. Honestly, it was like there was an odd haze Jack saw as he walked through the crowds of his inebriated co-workers, the only thing he could focus on was her and the purring sensation. Another door, a group of passed out people, another portal, this time to the outside where darkness had fallen showed some people and anthros swimming in the pool or hot tub.

They never really stuck around each room for long, they casually greeted their co-workers, some more enthusiastic than others, some people shot wayward glances at them. Jack saw them, either staring at Meghan and her body, or the fact that she was with him. A LOT of glares from the female anthros directed towards her, and a lot of jealous stares from the human males; who never bothered a second glance at Meghan until now. Jack and Meghan ignored these and instead took the time to socialize with their more friendly acquaintances, talking to some about their families or the latest games, and even some sports talk. On guy even tried to convince Jack and Meghan to join his DnD group just because they listened to his eagerness when explaining the rules.

Presently they were outside, sitting in a gazebo together, still sporting the same drinks from nearly 3 hours prior to getting there. Meghan still purred against Jack's side, and occasionally turned sharply so his hand slid under her sweater to feel her soft tummy and the ever present navel piercing.  

"This was nicer than I thought it would be" she said, snuggling up further against him and purring louder than before. The sky was clear and stars shone brightly as they sat together under a full moon. A sharp gust of chilly autumn air blew past, making Jack shiver a bit involuntarily.

"Cold?  Meghan teased slightly, rubbing a paw up and down Jack's chest.
 
"You're not?" He asked incredulously, looking deep into her violet eyes as he rubbed up and down her sides and love handles, each time pushing his hand a little lower on her hips.

"Furrrrr" She mocked, whapping him lightly with her tail.

Jack shooed the offending limb, smiling as he did so.

"Right, Snoon, Thick Fur” he chuckled.

"Mhm I’m right at home in the cold! But...not so much parties. Thank you for bringing me along" she said first in confidence, then in slight sadness. She looked around, at the house, the lights and the people. It was new for her, she recalled being made fun of in school for being a hybrid, but as soon as Jack was there, Was HERE, most other people didn't even care. Jack knew of how people were mean to her for what she was, but never even cared, even though it might tarnish his image; she appreciated that.

"I'm more than happy to bring you here with me Meghan, How could I not? You’re my gir-" he started only to have his words cut off my a yell from outside the Gazebo.

"THERE YOU ARE MUTT" Came a screeching feminine voice that hurt Jacks ears. The couple looked out over the carefully manicured lawn to see a group of Female anthros marching angrily towards them. Meghan shrank back, trying to look as small as possible while trying to get into Jack's jacket. The group stopped at the entrance of the small wooden structure and Jack recognized them. Rachel, the girl who was showing off her ring on the day Meghan and Jack talked to Jasmine; Desiree, the Anthro that begged Jack to fuck her in a closet, and a few others who Jack knew were constantly putting Meghan down.

"When we heard you came here with a boyfriend, we were shocked; then when we heard it was Iron Jack, we couldn't believe our ears, yet here you are" Desiree seethed, looking from Jack to the still trying to hide Snoon.

"And you Jack, you chose this...this thing! Over any of us purebreds!? We have everything she has and More, what could you possible want with a-"

Her words were cut off as Jack pulled Meghan out of her shrinking form and kissed her deeply, and pushing his tongue into her mouth. She made a surprised "Mmmm" then simply went along with it, pushing back with her tongue, her posture shifting from trying to hide to wanting to show off and kiss Jack with more passion.

He pulled away and saw Meghan panting slightly, her violet eyes looking at him with adoration that it spurned him further. Much to the consternation of the now dumbstruck group of anthros, Jack pulled Meghan into his lap so they were both facing the would-be aggressors.

"What does she have that you don't?" He mimicked, smugness in his voice as his hands crept under the sweater to those cantaloupe sized breasts that had teased him all night. Meghan moaned slightly as he groped them, grinding her hips against him.

"For starters, She doesn't have a shit personality" he glowered as his finger found the barbells of Meghan’s nipples and pinched them slightly, not breaking eye contact with the leader of the group.

"Secondly she actually talked to me, instead of trying to pull some kind of porno rip-off attempt at seduction" he continued, gently pulling her nipples by the barbells.

"And lastly, she's one of the nicest, smartest and sexiest women I know; you are all so shallow I could stand in you and not get my feet wet; and you hate her just because of her lineage; but you got nothing she has" He finished with a smug grin and his hands now cupped and squeezed her breasts, earning more moans and purring. The observers were left stunned at this display and were speechless for a moment, but eventually the spell broke.

"H-hey you can't say and do th-" one started only to get shut down with a stern stare from Jack.

"Or what you obnoxious cretins?" he asked dryly; silence was his answer.

"That’s right, now if you'll excuse us, we're going home and we are going to fuck all night, and you all get to think about THAT, think about it all night long while you get none" he informed the crowd. With that, he slipped his hands out of her sweater, then picked her up like they were newlyweds, earning small kisses all over his face from the adorable lady in his arms.

Past the stunned group of rejected and dejected anthro females, right up to the back door of the obnoxiously huge mansion. It was only then that he set the happy Snoon to her feet, only for her to latch onto him in a bear hug.

"That was amazing, Jack" She cooed as he handed the valet the ticket for his car.

"Just telling the truth" he said with a smile, earning a kiss from her.

"hope you plan on fulfilling what you said to them though" she said, pressing her breasts against his chest harder than before, allowing her nipple piercings to be felt in full force.

"Oh trust me, I plan on it and them some" he said with a grin, knowing this night would be one to remember.

Chapter 5: Want You

Meghan had her chest pressed against Jack while he kept his arm around her waist as they walked quickly through the house, retracing their steps through the immense building. There might have been a more direct path, but neither of them knew it, so they just had to rely in memory. The memory part was a bit hard because the walk was full of stops. At one point Meghan pulled Jack into a corner and kissed him deeply, forcing a long tongue into his mouth and rubbing her clawed, padded fingers tracing up and down his body. Another time Jack pinned her and groped under her sweater again, feeling her nipple and navel piercings, pressing kisses into Meghan’s face and cute snout.

The other people at the party were nothing more than sideshows, they might have seen what Jack and Meghan were doing, but that didn't matter. Why would it? Jack's sole focus was the sexiness of Meghan, her body and her perfect mind, while Meghan was bolstered out of her self-doubt from Jack's actions. The Groping, the confidence, the machismo and the words of chastisement towards all the girls that had hurt her.

It was a long time before the two of them made it to the valet, who looked at them with mild disinterest.

"Ticket sir?" the raccoon anthro said blandly as Jack tried to fend Meghan away for long enough to give a coherent answer. The valet took the ticket, mumbling to himself about how humans get the best girls. A lustful haze permeated the whole situation, Jack looked at Meghan, and she looked at him; her body was something to be in awe of, something that would make anyone blush at, everything on her was amazing, perfect tits, perfect ass, perfect everything.

That perfectness extended beyond her body though; she was smart, kind, loyal, and the nicest person Jack had ever met. Even with all her lack of self-esteem she was beyond a doubt the best woman he had ever been with. In fact, no other woman even held a flickering candle to her, and he doubted all the other anthros of the office attempting to seduce "Iron Jack" had more depth than a puddle. Meghan loved games, fun, doing stupid silly things like breaking out to badly timed dancing in the living room when music was playing; and it was all worth it. 

"Here are your keys sir, no need to tip, the house has us covered" the raccoon said in a monotone voice, boredom permeating every word.

Jack opened a door for Meghan, looking at her sleek legs and back as she got into the car, her fur soft and shimmering in the moonlight. She sat down gracefully, then looked up at him with a beckoning longing, mouthing the words "Come hither" while beckoning with a padded finger. Jack wasted no time hurrying around the car and getting in. The drive would be maybe 30 minutes if they went to Meghan’s townhouse, longer if they went to his apartment. He didn't know how long she would be able to endure the loving lust, fuck, he wasn't sure how long HE would be able to endure it.

"Mmmm go~" Came Meghan’s sultry voice, full of love and seduction. This voice from her was much MUCH different from the night where she had gotten hopelessly drunk and tried to seduce him. Then it was just blind lust, the kind solved with a firm set of fingers or a battery operated boyfriend; this was full of want beyond sexual gratification, it wanted the intimacy behind the act. The car started, roaring to life and Jack floored it, rocketing forward to a happy evening.

Jack shook the lustful haze from his head, focusing on the road even though Meghan touched and chided him for attention. He wasn't drunk on alcohol, rather he was drunk on Meghan, her touch, the feeling of her fur and her reactions to his stimulation. there were sultry moans of pleasure as he teased her nipple piercings with a free hand, guided there by Meghan's soft padded paws.

The thought of her, and the gentle touch made Jack press his luck further than he had in the past. He had never gotten a speeding ticket, hell, he had never even gotten a parking ticket; But the thought of Meghan in the seat next to him, full of desire and want, that made him speed. He pushed his car harder than he ever had before, thinking only of the Snoon besides him.

"Hurry up Jack" She purred, pulling the virgin killer sweater into the fold between her cantaloupe sized breasts. Purple beads at the ends of her piercings glinted in the streetlights as Jack drove underneath them. One glance told him that it was all the encouragement he needed, he pressed the gas pedal to the floor of his car as he zoomed forwards. Nothing else mattered to him, just the lovely Snoon who was so delectably beautiful and wanting more. She cupped her paws around her breasts, pushing them together and looking longingly at Jack as he drove. God dammit, it should be illegal to look at someone like that.

"Focus, try not to notice" Was Jack's mantra as he drove, trying HARD to ignore the gentle paws, touching him. Trying to ignore the light glinting off the nipple piercings of the lustful Snoon. Trying to ignore the longing he felt to just pull over and take her on the hood of the car. No, this needed more than just bending her over and fucking her; more love, less lust.

After what seemed like hours, the 20 minutes of driving ended, Jack having sped so much that he doubted any cops would have been able to keep up. As soon as the engine died Jack was out of the car, rushing through the cool autumn air to open the door for Meghan. She didn't even bother to cover herself as she strutted, bolstered by Jack's lust. Her breasts jiggled softly as she walked and Jack knew that in any other time, she would shy away from the light, hiding her body from anyone but him, this confidence was only from Jack's actions and the time of the night, which assured there would be no peeping toms.

"Come on love" Meghan said with a cool, sultry tone as she unlocked her front door. Jack did not question it, he followed her like a thrall would follow his succubus. Meghan lived alone in her townhouse, which made her strides even more confident as she strutted up the stairs, her tail flicking behind her as she walked. At some point Meghan had ditched the sweater, leaving her wearing nothing but a black lace thong.

"Come on" She said in the same "come hither" attitude, as her foot paws silently hit her townhouse stairs, leading upwards to the secrets beyond. Jack had never gone upstairs in Meghan's townhouse, partially out of respect, partially out of he never really cared about what was up there. Why should he care about what was up there? A bedroom, maybe a spare and a bathroom. When the time came for him to see it, he would venture into it and see the world of Meghan and whatever she wanted to show him.

Today was that day, he got to see a spare bedroom with an easel, a bathroom and Meghan’s bedroom, her little hidden room that he had never seen. Jack learned a long time ago that you can judge a lot of things from a person from their bedroom, or rather whatever room they spent the most time in. Meghan's bedroom was covered in posters from movies and video games, and a few clumps of dirty clothing that had missed the basket. It looked like it was lived in, a stark contrast to the rest of her townhouse which was always so clean.

Presently Meghan stood in the middle of her room, shivering slightly as she looked at Jack, her ears folded and her tail flicking in front of her. Her confidence, probably fueled by Jack's act of defiance from those bitchy anthros, was all but dried up. She stood, staring at him, her arms crossed across herself and under her breasts, propping them up slightly.

"W-well, I know I-I'm not as prett-"

She didn't get to finish those words as Jack rushed forwards, embracing her and pulling her into a kiss. She let out a soft surprised squeak, then melted into his embrace, and falling into the kiss. His tongue pushed into her mouth gently, feeling the inherited fangs of the snow leopard part of her as her clawed fingers stripped him of his jacket and found their way under his shirt. The kiss parted when she felt his chest.

"What are?" Meghan started as her padded paws felt the skin on his chest for the first time. Jack glowered and looked away as Meghan slowly raised his shirt. Long raised scars marred his chest and abs in crisscrossing patterns. Meghan’s pads ran across each one, her eyes wide and fearful as she looked at them.

"What happened to you?" Meghan asked, never taking her eyes from the scars.

"Brazil, I was looking for some Anons and the militia, whatever they called themselves caught me" He grumbled, taking a gentle hold of Meghan’s paw and tracing the scars.

"Box cutter, filet knife, hook knife, machete, the rest I don’t remember" he said, drawing her pads across a different scars each time. Her eyes met his as he did so, but he didn't allow anything beyond a neutral expression. The memories hurt of course, the pain and the despair, but he had moved on and away from field work since then.

"All of them are nothing beyond a memory, and bad memories are nothing now that I get to see the real you" he murmured, gently cupping a hand to Meghan’s jaw and running a thumb along her warm soft cheek. Meghan's ears perked upright quickly at those words and she looked up at him with a half-smile.

"Did you mean what you said back there? That I'm smart and sexy?" she whispered up to him, her eyes meeting his, full of concern. Jack kissed her again before answering.

"Every word" He replied, running his fingered through her hair and fur, feeling her skin under her soft fur. She shivered at the feeling of his touch, then pounced upwards on her tiptoes to kiss him once more, her tongue pushing into his mouth violently and with more fervor than before. Her paws gripped the bottom of his shirt, trying to grab and it up over his shoulders. She wasn't quite tall enough, but Jack assisted her, pulling the band t-shirt off and flinging it aside.

Keeping on tiptoes is hard for a long period of time though, and Meghan lost her balance mid t-shirt fling. Jack caught her and also got set off balance, making them both tumble onto Meghan’s oversized and very plushy bed. Taking advantage of the situation, Meghan promptly got on top of Jack, her clawed fingers pressing against his chest and she looked at him.

"You stay put and let me do this at my own speed ok?" she purred, slowly drawing back and straddling him with a coy smile. Gently, Meghan unbuttoned his jeans, and slid them down under her, allowing Jack to kick them off unceremoniously. His boxers didn't last much longer than his jeans, only to be impatiently torn away by Meghan’s claws as soon as she saw the bulge barely contained within. Her eyes rested on his now unrestrained erection, confidence wavering as she looked at him, getting to her knees in front of Jack.

"It’s...it's a real one" She murmured, her padded paws gently rubbing up and down Jack's length. Meghan was careful in her strokes, making sure her sharp claws were well away from Jack's body. She seemed in a trance as she gently stroked his length up and down, like it was something she hadn't really thought she would see, like if someone suddenly saw Bigfoot and got to take him to the park. Her muzzle rubbed gently against his length, sniffing and breathing in deep.  Her eyes focused for a second on Jack's face as she gave a gentle lick with her tongue. Most feline anthro inherited the raspy sandpaper tongues of their parents, But Meghan’s tongue was warm, wet and smooth, gliding gently up and down his length and she shifted herself on him.

Propping herself up on her elbows, she placed his member between her full voluptuous breasts, pressing them together as she gently kissing the tip in over done smooches of affection. Slow and gentle up and down motions from her paws slid her silky smooth breasts up and down along his shaft as she continued kissing and gently licking the head of Jack's throbbing erection.  Jack in turn ran his fingers through Meghan’s hair and fur, through the softness of it and feeling the rare sensation of her skin, supple and soft as his fingertips parted her fur.

Gently Meghan’s tongue caressed and wrapped around his length as she took him into his mouth, the warm wetness of it coupled with the pleasant feeling of her silken fur as she pressed her beautiful breasts onto his pelvis and shaft. There were more gentle kisses and licks as her violet eyes locked onto his, searching for confirmation, that it was ok. His hands answered her, cupping her breasts and pushing them together with a bit more force. Gentle moans escaped her throat as he did so, the ever present purring from the Snoon driving him mad with want.

She pushed herself further, moving her breasts faster up and down his shaft with a desire fueled want, any technique she might have had thrown aside for sheer want. The Slippery wetness from Meghan’s saliva paired with the soft silkiness of her fur made her movements gentle and sleek, sending pleasure up Jack's spine as she pumped her breasts up and down with determination. She lacked skill, that much was certain, and Jack was sure she had only learned this from porn or some other means, but his gasps of pleasure told him that he didn't care.

Her speed increased, as did the rapid kisses which lead onto her gently sucking the tip of his shaft while she pumped her breasts up and down faster. Gentle "mmm"s of pleasure emanated from Meghan as she groped her own breasts, assisted by Jack's hands

"M-Meghan holy f-fuck I’m close" Jack barely grunted, his hands gripping Meghan’s breasts with clamp- like fierceness. Meghan's eyes shone in the dim light, an almost eager hunger behind that flash of light. Jack's word's spurned her eagerness, moving faster with less rhythm and sheer want. Throwing off the fast yet steady pace she had before. The disruption was unwanted, throwing of the study buildup of pleasure Jack had anticipated.

Jack in term took control, lessening his grip on her breasts, and instead guiding them in a fast yet steady movement. Meghan got the pacing quickly and took it up on her own, still suckling gently and with her eyes full of want. Jack felt the release he so desired inching closer as her eyes locked onto his with eager want and need for approval. She let out more gentle moans as he guiding her movements, earning small "mm”s of approval as he gently moved her, with her movements quickly matching his.

Jack didn't even get the chance to say anything when his climax hit him like a ton of bricks. His seed sprayed into Meghan’s gently suckling mouth with a surprised "mmpf?" before she drank it down, still sucking softly.

Have you ever had an orgasm after a very long time? One where your legs shuddered and shook uselessly as you rode through your climax? It’s a rare feeling and totally involuntary.

Jack felt that, as Meghan continued kissing and suckling his member as he came in her mouth. A gentle "Mmmm" resonated from deep within Meghan as she swallowed and then simply gave gentle kisses to Jack's member, caressing him between her breasts as his hands numbly held her breasts.

"Did you like it?" Meghan’s said, between gentle kisses, looking jack dead in the eyes, her purring resonating deep within him. All he could to was numbly nod, which earned a smile from Meghan as she gently licked and nuzzled his member happily.

"Mmm good, I was nervous for my first time" she purred out, licking his length softly as she looked at him. For some reason those words froze him to the core.

"First time?" he choked out, half in pleasure and half in disbelief.

"Mhm, most guys...and girls, didn't want a hybrid like me, so I’ve been..." her voice trailed off, a haunting sadness to her words, Jack ignored the awkwardness and leaned forwards wrapping his arms around her nude body and pulling her back onto him so he was laying with his back flat against her bed, with her laying on him with a surprised look on her muzzle.

Meghan’s hair fell, partially obscuring her face as she looked at Jack, this stunt allowed him to see the confused and loving look on Meghan's face. She looked like she was utterly into just bending to jack's will, yet reserved and afraid. Jack kissed her forehead softly, his hand pressed to the side her face and snout, guiding her with sheer trust and acceptance.

"I don't care about all that Meghan, I only care about you and making you happy" he said, after pulling back softly. Meghan's purrs began once more, sending loving vibrations through Jack's body. She laid on him, her paws at his sides and jack held her close, his hands on her back and under beautifully colored hair. Her tail flicked lazily and her purring never ceased. Meghan's ears flicked and she looked down at Jack after a while.

"Something is poking me~" She said with a sing song tone in her voice and Jack felt his face flush.

"It’s *ahem* because your tits are pressed against me and your purring" He stated "plus you’re sexy Meghan". He accompanied those last few words with a hearty squeeze of her generous ass which earned him a startled squeak of surprise. Meghan lightly hit his chest, then sat up to straddle him and scooted back a bit so his shaft was between her thighs.

"Ok ok.... just like the videos" Meghan murmured to herself, gently twirling a padded finger on his shaft.

"You ok?" Jack asked pensively, looking up at the unsure Snoon, to which Meghan responded with a quick nod.

"Mhm...I just want to take it slow at first ok?" She answered nervously moved her thong aside, then raised herself and positioned herself and Jack's member. As soon as Jack's tip touched Meghan's wet folds, the heat was noticeable, not the searing heat, rather it was a warm and inviting feeling. 

"H-here we go" Meghan moaned, more to herself than to Jack as she began lowering herself. The tip of Jacks member slipped inside Meghan and she let out a soft long gasp, then continued lowering herself, quivering slightly as she did. Jack groaned from the pleasure, her insides were warm and tight, coupled with the vibrations from Meghan’s continued purring. Meghan was almost in a daze as her paws laid on his chest to support herself, and Jack placed his hands on her ample hips.

"O-ok, I'm gonna s-start moving" Meghan moaned, her tail swishing behind her quickly. Jack was about to make a comment about that line sounding like a line from a Japanese porn novel (what were they called again?), but stopped himself because she probably DID learn that from a porn novel. Instead he just ran his fingers through her fur and let her set a pace for herself.

He watched as Meghan raised herself slightly, then gingerly lowered herself with a tiny moan. Guiding her hips with his hands, he helped her find a slow gentle rhythm. Each time she lowered herself, there was a quick tightening and then relaxation of her muscles that sent waves of pleasure through Jack.  She moaned softly and closed her eyes as she began moving her hips in small circles, while still pumping herself up and down.

Jack had been with plenty of girls in the past, one or 2 in high school, more than a few in college, and maybe 2-3 since college. None of them compared to Meghan in terms of sheer pleasure, willingness and tightness. Her insides roiled softly against his member, eager for him to give her everything. Her breasts bounced healthily, as she gasped and dug her claws into his scarred chest and her long tail coiled around one of Jack's legs.

Jack slide his hands up Meghan's sides, through the soft fur of her tummy and lower chest, then rested them on her mesmerizing bouncing breasts. Catching her nipples piercings between his index and middle finger, he was able to tug them softly while squeezing and groping, which earned another gasp of pleasure.

Meghan's body moved like a piston by this point, her wetness leaking out of her slit and down Jack's length and inner thighs. Her moans were sharp and gasping as she worked herself higher and higher into ecstasy. Using his legs, Jack bucked his hips upwards to meet her hips as she dropped herself down, making Meghan dig her claws into his chest further.  Her inner walls tightened and her legs shuddered as he did so, encouraging him to keep it up. Jack moved his hands back down Meghan's body and onto her hips, helping move her a bit faster and bring her down onto him harder.

"J-Jack I-I'm gonna c-c-cum!" Meghan gasped as she rode him, her claws breaking the skin of his chest. He groaned in both pain and pleasure as she redoubled her efforts, driving her hips down harder, making a soft clapping noise each time their pelvises met. Her legs shuttered harder and Jack felt her inside clamp down like a wet and slippery vice as she reached her climax and let out a deep moan of pleasure. Jack continued bucking up into Meghan as her climax hit and the ensuing tightness brought Jack's second climax even closer.

"Meghan I'm gonna-!"

"DO IT" Meghan cried in pleasure as he thrust hard into her. Needed no second invitation, Jack gave one last hard thrust as he brought her hips down to meet his, painting her insides with his seed, a deep groan escaping his mouth as he did so.

They stayed in that position for a minute, gasps and panting as Meghan's tremors subsided and Jack caught his breath. With a quiet soft moan Meghan lifted herself off of jack, sliding is shaft out of her, then she rolled slightly and flopped onto the bed next to him on her side. She placed paw on his chest and looked into his eyes for reassurance.

"W-was it good?" she asked with a small smile, Jack panted still and just nodded before a slight frown crossed his face.

"What's wrong?" Meghan said, sitting up suddenly in shock and confusion.

"Uh, are you on the pill or something?" Jack asked, sitting up himself and looking at the Snoon, who had a concerned frown on her muzzle.

"Wha-?... Oh! Oh, No there's no need to worry about that Jack, Hybrids can't get pregnant, or it’s like less than 1 percent they even can" she reassured him with a smile. With those words jack let out a sigh, wrapped his arms around Meghan, then flopped back onto the bed. Meghan giggled and snuggled up to him and kissed him softly; then pulled away, looking down.

"I...I think I love you Jack" She said quietly, then looked up into Jack's eyes searching for a response.

"I Love you too Meghan" he reassured with a soft kiss on her forehead, pulling her closer. Meghan’s purrs redoubled and they laid together, basking in the afterglow until sleep took them both.